District of Columbia statutes.
19-501

Definitions.

For the purposes of the chapter, the term:

(1)

“Co-owners with right of survivorship” includes joint tenants, tenants by the entireties, and other co-owners of property or accounts held under circumstances that entitles one or more to the whole of the property or account on the death of the other or others.

(2)

“Governing instrument” means a deed, will, trust, insurance or annuity policy, account with POD designation, pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or similar benefit plan, instrument creating or exercising a power of appointment or a power of attorney, or a dispositive, appointive, or nominative instrument of any similar type.

(3)

“Payor” means a trustee, insurer, business entity, employer, government, governmental agency, subdivision, or instrumentality, or any other person authorized or obligated by law or a governing instrument to make payments.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 202, 48 DCR 2087

This section was previously enacted by section 1 of Public Law 89-183, 79 Stat. 700, but repealed by implication by D.C. Law 13-292.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (1993 Act).

1973 Ed., § 19-501.
1981 Ed., § 19-501.